Utah statutes.
16-10a-1020.   Amendment of bylaws by board of directors or shareholders.
(1)  A corporation's board of directors may amend the corporation's bylaws at
any time, except to the extent that the articles of incorporation, the bylaws,
or this chapter reserve this power exclusively to the shareholders, in whole
or part.
(2)  A corporation's shareholders may amend the corporation's bylaws at any
time, even though the bylaws may also be amended at any time by the board of
directors.
